Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5595.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21-28.9 of the General Laws entitled "The Good Samaritan Overdose
Prevention Act of 2016" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
21-28.9-6. Opioid overdose prevention in college and university housing.
(a) Every institute of higher education in the State of Rhode Island including all public and
private colleges and universities shall provide training in the administration of opioid antagonists
to every resident assistant as designated by the institution. Such campuses shall provide and
maintain on site in each college or university-owned or operated housing units, opioid antagonists
in quantities and types sufficient to meet the needs of the housing unit. Such opioid antagonists
shall be accessible by resident assistants for use during emergencies to any student, staff, or other
individual.
(b) Every institute of higher education under this section may designate additional
employees or staff members who administer opioid antagonists on a voluntary basis in the event a
resident assistant is not physically present at a suspected overdose incident; provided that, such
employee is trained in the administration of opioid antagonists.
(c) Any person or entity acting reasonably and in good faith in compliance with this section
shall not be subject to criminal, civil, or administrative liability solely by reason of such action,
pursuant to chapter 28.9 of title 21, nor shall they be subject to liability, penalty, or disciplinary
action based on any college or university rules, regulations, or procedures.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
========
LC001850/SUB A
========
LC001850/SUB A - Page 2 of 3